Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-3606
Mental Health Training Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Mental Health Training Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall consist of money transferred pursuant to section 79-3501 and any money transferred by the Legislature. The department shall use money in the fund for mental health training grants pursuant to section 79-3605. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.